src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#viđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#viđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#viđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#viđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#viđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#viđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#guđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#guđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#guđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#guđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#guđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#guđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#čihččet#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#čihččet#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#čihččet#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#čihččet#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
gávcciviđátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
gávcciguđátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
gávcciviđatlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
gávcciguđatlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
gávccičihččetlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
ovcciviđátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
ovcciguđátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
ovcciviđatlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
ovcciguđatlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
ovccičihččetlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
gávcciviđátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
gávcciguđátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
gávcciviđatlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
gávcciguđatlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
gávccičihččetlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
ovcciviđátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
ovcciguđátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
ovcciviđatlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIVIDATLOHKAI ;
ovcciguđatlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGUDATLOHKAI ;
ovccičihččetlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCICIHCCETLOHKAI ;
